District of Columbia statutes.
3-1212.04

Physical therapy assistants; references thereto.

For a period of 12 months following March 6, 2007, all references to a physical therapy assistant shall be deemed to refer to a person meeting the requirements for licensure in the District, regardless of whether that person is licensed in fact.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1204
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-220, § 2(f), 53 DCR 10216